Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Report to the legislature. (a) By February 15 each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over housing finance and policy containing the following information: (1) the total number of applications for funding; (2) the amount of funding requested; (3) the amounts of funding awarded; and (4) the number of housing units that are affected by funding awards, including the number of: (i) newly constructed owner-occupied units; (ii) renovated owner-occupied units; (iii) newly constructed rental units; and (iv) renovated rental units. (b) This reporting requirement applies to appropriations for competitive development programs made in Laws 2023 and in subsequent laws. new text begin (c) By January 5 each year, the commissioner must report on the financial stability of the affordable housing industry. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the ratio of operating expenses to revenue in affordable rental housing projects; and new text end new text begin (2) the percent of rents collected on time, divided into four regions of the state: new text end new text begin (i) the cities of St. Paul and Minneapolis; new text end new text begin (ii) the metropolitan counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington, except for the cities of St. Paul and Minneapolis; new text end new text begin (iii) urban greater Minnesota, including the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud; and new text end new text begin (iv) rural greater Minnesota, which includes all of Minnesota, except for the places listed in items (i), (ii), and (iii). new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Local affordable housing aid annual meeting. new text end new text begin At least once each year, the commissioner must convene a meeting with the Interagency Council to End Homelessness and the cities and counties receiving local affordable housing aid under section 477A.35. The purpose of the meeting is to discuss: (1) the impacts of local affordable housing aid; (2) regional needs for affordable housing; and (3) recommendations for the collaborative use of funds to effectively address homelessness, housing insecurity, security of affordable housing, and the lack of housing supply. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.222, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commitment restriction. new text end new text begin The commissioner may not require commitment terms longer than the compliance period required under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin POLICY FRAMEWORK FOR TARGETED STABILIZATION OF REGULATED AFFORDABLE HOUSING.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must develop a policy framework for targeted stabilization of affordable rental housing. In developing this framework, the commissioner must identify strategies, tools, and funding mechanisms for targeted stabilization of affordable rental housing and recapitalization of distressed properties. The commissioner must identify potential improvements for regulatory relief for affordable rental housing providers and implement these improvements where feasible. new text end new text begin (b) By January 5, 2027, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing finance and policy on the policy framework, improvements implemented, and propose legislation that may be needed to support targeted stabilization of regulated affordable housing and recapitalization of distressed properties. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin INTERAGENCY STABILIZATION GROUP.new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency may convene regular meetings of public funders and affordable housing stakeholders to seek funding solutions that support preservation and stabilization of affordable properties. new text end